Washington statutes.
RCW 27.15.020

Request to establish library capital facility area—Ballot proposition.

(1) Upon receipt of a completed written request to both establish a library capital facility area and submit a ballot proposition under RCW 27.15.050 to finance library capital facilities, that is signed by a majority of the members of the board of trustees of a library district or board of trustees of a city or town library, the county legislative authority or county legislative authorities for the county or counties in which a proposed library capital facility area is to be established must submit a ballot proposition to voters to establish the proposed library capital facility area and authorize the library capital facility area to finance library capital facilities by issuing general indebtedness and imposing excess levies to retire the indebtedness. The ballot proposition must be submitted to voters at a general or special election. If the proposed election date is not a general election, the county legislative authority is encouraged to request an election when another unit of local government with territory located in the proposed library capital facility area is already holding a special election under RCW 29A.04.330. The ballot proposition must be approved by a supermajority vote.

(2) A completed request submitted under this section must include: (a) A description of the boundaries of the library capital facility area; and (b) a copy of the resolution of the legislative authority of each city or town, and board of trustees of each library district, with territory included within the proposed library capital facility area indicating both: (i) Its approval of the creation of the proposed library capital facility area; and (ii) agreement on how election costs will be paid for submitting the ballot proposition to voters.

(3) For the purposes of this section, a supermajority vote means the affirmative vote of a three-fifths majority of those voting on the proposition, and the total number of persons voting on the proposition must be at least 40 [forty] percent of the voters in the proposed library capital facility area who voted in the last preceding statewide general election.

[ 2020 c 207 s 2; 2015 c 53 s 4; 1996 c 258 s 1; 1995 c 368 s 3.]

NOTES: